src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON vanha_prop_ani_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: x_22_excns ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: RHyph ;

LEXICON vanha_prop_obj_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: x_22_excns ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: RHyph ;

LEXICON vanha_prop_org_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: x_22_excns ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: RHyph ;



!LEXICON vanha_prop_41
!+N+Prop: x_22_excns ;
!+N+Prop: RHyph ;

LEXICON vanha_prop_surplc_42
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x_22_inen ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x_22_inen ;
+N+Prop: RHyph ;

LEXICON vanha_prop_42
+N+Prop: x_22_inen ;
+N+Prop: RHyph ;

LEXICON vanha_prop_sur_42 ! lisätty koska muuten make ei toimi
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x_22_inen ;
+N+Prop: RHyph ;

!LEXICON vanha_prop_sur_42plc ! lisätty koska muuten make ei toimi
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x_22_inen ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x_22_inen ;
!+N+Prop: RHyph ;
