src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun !!= @CODE@ on kokeellinen leksikko
Kauhanen:Kauha vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kaijanen:Kaija vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Sarjanen:Sarja vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pihkanen:Pihka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pakkanen:Pakka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Laurinpakkanen:Laurinpakka vanha_prop_42 ;
Liikkanen:Liikka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Rokkanen:Rokka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Laukkanen:Laukka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Honkanen:Honka vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Tanskanen:Tanska vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Helanen:Hela vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Laamanen:Laama vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Homanen:Homa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kananen:Kana vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Vornanen:Vorna vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Sopanen:Sopa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Karppanen:Karppa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Maaranen:Maara vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Otranen:Otra vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kasanen:Kasa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Keisanen:Keisa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Riissanen:Riissa vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Huhtanen:Huhta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Valtanen:Valta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Rintanen:Rinta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Wirtanen:Wirta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Hautanen:Hauta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kuivanen:Kuiva vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Ritvanen:Ritva vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kalliainen:Kalli^ai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Haapiainen:Haapi^ai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Nousiainen:Nousi^ai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kautiainen:Kauti^ai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Siuruainen:Siuru^ai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Alhainen:Alhai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Kramppinen:Kramppi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Kaipiainen:Kaipiai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Nousiainen:Nousiai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Haimakainen:Haimakai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Uusi-Illikainen:Uusi^-Illikai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Raatikainen:Raatikai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Timoskainen:Timoskai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Karjalainen:Karjalai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Vesalainen:Vesalai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Korpelainen:Korpelai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Matilainen:Matilai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Poikolainen:Poikolai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Nikulainen:Nikulai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Tuomainen:Tuomai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pohjoismainen:Pohjoismai vanha_prop_42 ;
Kaipainen:Kaipai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Oikarainen:Oikarai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Vasarainen:Vasarai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Piirainen:Piirai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Oravainen:Oravai vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Ottavainen:Ottavai vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Valkeinen:Valkei vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Riihinen:Riihi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pulkkinen:Pulkki vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Rankinen:Ranki vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Särkinen:Särki vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Kaskinen:Kaski vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Keskinen:Keski vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Alinen:Ali vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Mällinen:Mälli vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Suominen:Suomi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Vanninen:Vanni vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Harmoinen:Harmoi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Lukkaroinen:Lukkaroi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Inkeroinen:Inkeroi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Piiroinen:Piiroi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Pappinen:Pappi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Kemppinen:Kemppi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pekkarinen:Pekkari vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Luostarinen:Luostari vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Häyrinen:Häyri vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Jaatinen:Jaati vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kaartinen:Kaarti vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Lemettinen:Lemetti vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Huittinen:Huitti vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Mönttinen:Möntti vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Juutinen:Juuti vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Huovinen:Huovi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Ylhäinen:Ylhäi vanha_prop_surplc_42 ;
Jyrkiäinen:Jyrkiäi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pentikäinen:Pentikäi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Sipiläinen:Sipiläi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Mäkäläinen:Mäkäläi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kämäräinen:Kämäräi vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Ahonen:Aho vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Purhonen:Purho vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Sorjonen:Sorjo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Haikonen:Haiko vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kaikkonen:Kaikko vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Laukkonen:Laukko vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Eskonen:Esko vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Alonen:Alo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Ellonen:Ello vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Simonen:Simo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Vienonen:Vieno vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Lounonen:Louno vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Loponen:Lopo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Ropponen:Roppo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Teronen:Tero vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Lauronen:Lauro vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kosonen:Koso vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Siitonen:Siito vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Partonen:Parto vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Levonen:Levo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Arvonen:Arvo vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Lajunen:Laju vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Salkunen:Salku vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Huppunen:Huppu vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Kuitunen:Kuitu vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Henttunen:Henttu vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Hynynen:Hyny vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Tähkänen:Tähkä vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Törmänen+Err/Orth:Dørmænen vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Keränen:Kerä vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Pylvänen:Pylvä vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Rönkkönen:Rönkkö vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Könönen:Könö vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
Mørebas:Møreba vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Patrobas:Patroba vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Adidas:Adida vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Adjagas:Adjaga vanha_prop_org_41 ; ! sub?
Tulokas:Tulokka vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Eurokas:Eurok2a vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Aškenas:Aškena vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Lapparnas:Lapparna vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Samernas:Samerna vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Kolalappernas:Kolalapperna vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Kempas:Kemppa vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Veritas:Verit2a vanha_prop_org_41 ;
emacs:emac vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Graphics:Graphic vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Genigraphics:Genigraphic vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Nordmands:Nordmand vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Blåvands:Blåvand vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Skargårds:Skargård vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Mercedes:Mercede vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Etymologisches:Etymologische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Uralisches:Uralische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Germanisches:Germanische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Estnisches:Estnische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Inarilappisches:Inarilappische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Frisches:Frische vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Technologies:Technologie vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Hellbillies:Hellbillie vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Baskkes:Baskke vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Beatles:Beatle vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Times:Time vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Airlines:Airline vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Notes:Not2e vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Josefs:Josef vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Karybdis:Karybdi vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Borealis:Boreali vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Quirinalis:Quirinali vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Allis:Alli vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Temis:Temi vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Themis:Themi vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Sybaris:Sybari vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Solaris:Solari vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Fenris:Fenri vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Farris:Farri vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Genesis:Genesi vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Justis:Justi vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Lycos:Lyco vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Calvados:Calvado vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Addos:Addo vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Bandidos:Bandido vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Sekundos:Sekundo vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Uranos:Urano vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Linos:Lino vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Kripos:Krip2o vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Kerberos:Kerbero vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Pegasos:Pegaso vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Phillips:Phillip vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Pripps:Pripp vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Hjelpekorps:Hjelpekorp vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Workgroups:Workgroup vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Snickers:Snicker vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Affairs:Affair vanha_prop_org_41 ;
QuarkXPress:QuarkXPres vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Congress:Congres vanha_prop_org_41 ;
MotoCross:MotoCros vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Swebus:Swebu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Airbus:Airbu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Føbus:Føbu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Circus:Circu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Aldus:Aldu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Findus:Findu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Eksodus:Eksodu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Argus:Argu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Sykehus:Sykehu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Norplus:Norplu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Gyrodactylus:Gyrodactylu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Katekismus:Katekismu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Uranus:Uranu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Rhenus:Rhenu vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Taunus:Taunu vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Campus:Camp2u vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Gummerus:Gummeru vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Gunnerus:Gunneru vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Forus:Foru vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Taurus:Tauru vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Pegasus:Pegasu vanha_prop_ani_41 ;
Status:Stat2u vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Tractatus:Tractat2u vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Præfectus:Præfect2u vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Windows:Window vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Airways:Airway vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Nordlys:Nordly vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Unisys:Unisy vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Yritys:Yrit2y vanha_prop_org_41 ;
Riksrøys:Riksrøy vanha_prop_obj_41 ;
Virta vanha_prop_sur_42 ;
